Arkansas, session 2025, HB1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANCY. There is hereby established for the Department of Labor and
Licensing - Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N117N DLL BD OF ACCT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(2) X021C DLL BD OF ACCT INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS10
(3) A086C BD OF ACCT FISCAL OFFICER/CPE COORD 1 GRADE GS06
(4) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
*KMW004*
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(5) X176C DLL BD OF ACCT ADMIN ASST/LIC SPEC 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Labor and
Licensing - Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTANCY -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas
State Board of Public Accountancy - Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $387,872
(02) EXTRA HELP 35,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 134,407
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 196,220
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 3,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 14,520
(06) EXAM FEES 280,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,076,019

03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE BOARD OF APPRAISERS, ABSTRACTERS,
AND HOME INSPECTORS. There is hereby established for the Department of Labor
and Licensing - State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N146N DLL BD OF APPRAISER EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(2) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(3) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(4) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(5) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(6) X185C DLL ABSTRACTORS BOARD SECRETARY GEN 1 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF APPRAISERS, ABSTRACTERS, AND
HOME INSPECTORS - ABSTRACTERS BOARD FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from the Arkansas
Abstracters' Board Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters,
and Home Inspectors - Abstracters Board Fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $0
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 0
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 15,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163

TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $30,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF APPRAISERS, ABSTRACTERS, AND
HOME INSPECTORS - ARKANSAS HOME INSPECTORS REGISTRATION BOARD FUND. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable
from the Arkansas Home Inspectors Registration Fund, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board
of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors - Arkansas Home Inspectors
Registration Board Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $45,940
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 18,142
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 23,100
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $112,182

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF APPRAISERS, ABSTRACTERS, AND
HOME INSPECTORS - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Labor and Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing -
State Board of Appraisers, Abstracters, and Home Inspectors - Cash for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $258,334
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 91,020
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 188,288
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 18,153
(C) PROF. FEES 1,727
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $557,522

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF APPRAISERS, ABSTRACTERS, AND
HOME INSPECTORS - FEDERAL PROGRAMS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from the federal funds as
designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses
of the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board of Appraisers,
Abstracters, and Home Inspectors - Federal Programs for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $80,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 21,500
(C) PROF. FEES 14,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $116,500

SECTION 9. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE ATHLETIC COMMISSION. There is
hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Athletic
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - STATE ATHLETIC COMMISSION - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be
payable from the Arkansas Athletic Commission Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Athletic
Commission - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $52,545
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 18,894
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 41,880
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 10,917
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $124,236

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - STATE ATHLETIC COMMISSION - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Athletic Commission - Cash for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $46,671
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 18,640
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 164,303
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $229,614

SECTION 12. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF ARCHITECTS,
LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTS AND INTERIOR DESIGNERS. There is hereby established for
the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas State Board of Architects,
Landscape Architects and Interior Designers for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N116N DLL BD OF ARCHITECTS EXECUTIVE DIR 1 GRADE GS12
(2) C011C DLL BD OF ARCH ADMIN ASST/OFFICE MGR 1 GRADE GS07
(3) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF ARCHITECTS,
LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTS AND INTERIOR DESIGNERS - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas State Board of Architects,
Landscape Architects and Interior Designers - Operations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $192,723
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 67,414
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 86,691
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 12,700
(C) PROF. FEES 0
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $359,528

SECTION 14. REGULAR SALARIES - AUCTIONEERS LICENSING BOARD. There is
hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - Auctioneers
Licensing Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) G159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 15. EXTRA HELP - AUCTIONEERS LICENSING BOARD. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Labor and Licensing - Auctioneers Licensing
Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-
time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - AUCTIONEERS LICENSING BOARD - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Auctioneers Licensing
Board - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $66,456
(02) EXTRA HELP 15,780
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 23,710
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 31,250
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,640
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 500
(06) CLAIMS 1,375
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $146,711

SECTION 17. REGULAR SALARIES - PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDS COMPANY AND
PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDSMAN LICENSING BOARD. There is hereby established for
the Department of Labor and Licensing - Professional Bail Bonds Company and
Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X022C DLL BAIL BONDSMAN BD EXECUTIVE DIR 1 GRADE GS09
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(3) X168C DLL BAIL BONDSMAN BD INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS04
(4) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDS COMPANY AND
PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDSMAN LICENSING BOARD - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the Bail Bondsman Board Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Labor and Licensing - Professional Bail Bonds Company and
Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing Board - Operations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $198,933
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 75,766
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 102,171
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,000
(C) PROF. FEES 2,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $381,870

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDS COMPANY AND
PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDSMAN LICENSING BOARD - TREASURY CASH REIMBURSEMENTS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to process security deposits and pay
outstanding judgments of bail bonds companies that go out of business by the
Department of Labor and Licensing - Professional Bail Bonds Company and
Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing Board - Treasury Cash Reimbursements for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $220,000

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDS COMPANY AND
PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDSMAN LICENSING BOARD - BAIL BOND RECOVERY. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable
from the Bail Bond Recovery Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses for the recovery of forfeited professional bail bonds of the
Department of Labor and Licensing - Professional Bail Bonds Company and
Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing Board - Bail Bond Recovery for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(01) RECOVERY OF FORFEITED PROFESSIONAL
BAIL BONDS $1,169,459

SECTION 21. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE BOARD OF BARBER EXAMINERS. There
is hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board
of Barber Examiners for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X028C DLL BD OF BARBER EXAM SECRETARY 1 GRADE GS07
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(3) X159C DLL BD OF BARBER EXAM INSPECTOR 1 GRADE GS03
(4) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4

SECTION 22. EXTRA HELP - STATE BOARD OF BARBER EXAMINERS. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board of
Barber Examiners for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-
time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in
the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this
act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF BARBER EXAMINERS -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board
of Barber Examiners - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $181,950
(02) EXTRA HELP 10,802
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 73,657
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 27,350
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,550
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $297,309

SECTION 24. REGULAR SALARIES - CONTRACTORS LICENSING BOARD. There is
hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - Contractors
Licensing Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N090N DLL CONTRACTORS LICENSE ADMR/INVEST 1 GRADE GS13
(2) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(3) X073C DLL CONTRACTORS BOARD INVESTIGATOR 6 GRADE GS08
(4) E031C EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(5) X105C DLL CONTRACTORS LICENSING COORD 6 GRADE GS06
(6) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 17

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - CONTRACTORS LICENSING BOARD - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services, operating
expenses, and grants by the Department of Labor and Licensing - Contractors
Licensing Board - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $926,675
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 338,464
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 319,400
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000
(C) PROF. FEES 37,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) EDUCATION TRAINING GRANTS 150,000
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 60,000
(06) CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRY TRAINING GRANTS 100,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,946,539

SECTION 26. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE BOARD OF COLLECTION AGENCIES.
There is hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - State
Board of Collection Agencies for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X001N BD OF COLLECTION EXEC DIR 1 GRADE GS12
(2) X130C BD OF COLLECTION FIELD INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS05
(3) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(4) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4

SECTION 27. EXTRA HELP - STATE BOARD OF COLLECTION AGENCIES. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board of
Collection Agencies for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF COLLECTION AGENCIES -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services, operating expenses, and grants by the Department of Labor and
Licensing - State Board of Collection Agencies - Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $222,327
(02) EXTRA HELP 5,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 83,131
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 56,700
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,500
(C) PROF. FEES 16,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) DHS/UAMS/ASU MOUNTAIN HOME/UCA/SAU
SYSTEM GRANTS/HSU/ATU/NWA COMMUNITY
COLLEGE 1,475,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,862,658

SECTION 29. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE BOARD OF LICENSURE FOR
PROFESSIONAL ENGINEERS AND PROFESSIONAL SURVEYORS. There is hereby
established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board of
Licensure for Professional Engineers and Professional Surveyors for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N132N ENG & LAND SURVEYORS EXEC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(2) X030C REGULATORY BOARD CHIEF INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(3) C031C ENG & LAND SURVEYORS ASST EXEC DIR 1 GRADE GS07
(4) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(5) C045C LICENSING COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 30. EXTRA HELP - STATE BOARD OF LICENSURE FOR PROFESSIONAL
ENGINEERS AND PROFESSIONAL SURVEYORS. There is hereby authorized, for the
Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board of Licensure for Professional
Engineers and Professional Surveyors for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
(1) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF LICENSURE FOR PROFESSIONAL
ENGINEERS AND PROFESSIONAL SURVEYORS - OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Labor and Licensing - State Board of Licensure for
Professional Engineers and Professional Surveyors - Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $373,017
(02) EXTRA HELP 12,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 133,336
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 208,649
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,227
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(C) PROF. FEES 7,144
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $744,373

SECTION 32. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS FIRE PROTECTION LICENSING
BOARD. There is hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing
- Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X138C FIRE PROTECTION LICENSING BOARD DIR 1 GRADE GS06
(2) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
(3) X166C FIRE PROT LIC BRD INSPECTOR/INVEST 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3

SECTION 33. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS FIRE PROTECTION LICENSING BOARD -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the Fire Protection Licensing Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and
Licensing - Arkansas Fire Protection Licensing Board - Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $130,020
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 52,551
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 63,174
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,300
(C) PROF. FEES 1,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $250,045

SECTION 34. REGULAR SALARIES - HVAC LICENSING BOARD. There is hereby
established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - HVAC Licensing Board
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X081C PLUMBING/HVACR INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS08
(2) S018C HVACR MECHANICAL INSPECTOR 6 GRADE GS07
(3) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(4) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 9

SECTION 35. APPROPRIATION - HVAC LICENSING BOARD - OPERATIONS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be
payable from the Heating, Ventilation, Air Conditioning and Refrigeration
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor
and Licensing - HVAC Licensing Board - Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $441,805
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 172,119
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 102,751
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,063
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 4,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $723,738
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163

SECTION 36. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS MANUFACTURED HOME COMMISSION.
There is hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing -
Arkansas Manufactured Home Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X016C DLL MANUFACTURED HOMES COMM DIR 1 GRADE GS08
(2) X121C DLL MANUFACTURED HOUSING SPEC SUPV 1 GRADE GS05
(3) X155C DLL MANUFACTURED HOUSING SPEC 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3

SECTION 37. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS MANUFACTURED HOME COMMISSION -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the Manufactured Home Standards Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and
Licensing - Arkansas Manufactured Home Commission - Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $168,268
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 62,412
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 42,238
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,263
(C) PROF. FEES 825
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $275,006

SECTION 38. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS MANUFACTURED HOME COMMISSION -
OPERATING EXPENSES, REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS AND CLAIMS. There is hereby
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the Manufactured Housing Recovery Fund, for operating expenses and payment of
refunds/reimbursements and claims by the Department of Labor and Licensing -
Arkansas Manufactured Home Commission - Operating Expenses,
Refunds/Reimbursements and Claims for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $5,573
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 50,000
(03) CLAIMS 135,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $210,573

SECTION 39. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS MOTOR VEHICLE COMMISSION.
There is hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing -
Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N169N MOTOR VEHICLE COMMISSION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS10
(2) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(3) X120C MOTOR VEHICLE INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(4) X099C MOTOR VEHICLE LICENSE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(5) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 6

SECTION 40. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS MOTOR VEHICLE COMMISSION -
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the Motor Vehicle Commission Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing -
Arkansas Motor Vehicle Commission - Operations for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $277,248
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 110,131
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 62,750
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $455,129

SECTION 41. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS MOTOR VEHICLE COMMISSION -
AUTOMOTIVE TECHNOLOGIST EDUCATION GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from the Automotive
Technologist Education Grant Fund, for grants for the Automotive Technologist
Education Grant Program of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas
Motor Vehicle Commission - Automotive Technologist Education Grants for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AUTOMOTIVE TECHNOLOGIST EDUCATION
GRANTS $250,000

SECTION 42. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS REAL ESTATE COMMISSION. There
is hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas
Real Estate Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE IT02
(2) U097U DLL AREC EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(3) G054C DLL AREC DEPUTY EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(4) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
(5) C004C DLL AREC SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS08
(6) X091C DLL AREC SR REAL ESTATE INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(7) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS07
(8) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(9) X110C DLL AREC INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(10) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(11) X169C DLL AREC EXAMINER 1 GRADE GS04
(12) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 15

SECTION 43. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS REAL ESTATE COMMISSION. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas Real
Estate Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary or part-
time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in
the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this
act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 44. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS REAL ESTATE COMMISSION -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas
Real Estate Commission - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $803,424
(02) EXTRA HELP 8,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 302,465
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 397,744
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 26,662
(C) PROF. FEES 22,929
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 10,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,571,224

SECTION 45. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS REAL ESTATE COMMISSION - REAL
ESTATE RECOVERY. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor
and Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for paying
claims for damage payments and for costs associated with education activities
of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas Real Estate Commission -
Real Estate Recovery for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DAMAGE PAYMENT $250,000
(02) EDUCATION 102,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $352,500

SECTION 46. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS BOARD OF REGISTRATION FOR
PROESSIONAL GEOLOGISTS. There is hereby established for the Department of
Labor and Licensing - Arkansas Board of Registration for Professional
Geologists for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.
Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
(1) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 47. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS BOARD OF REGISTRATION FOR
PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGISTS. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of
Labor and Licensing - Arkansas Board of Registration for Professional
Geologists for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from
funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 48. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS BOARD OF REGISTRATION FOR
PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGISTS - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited
in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and
Licensing - Arkansas Board of Registration for Professional Geologists -
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $33,118
(02) EXTRA HELP 3,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 15,757
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 8,275
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $62,150

SECTION 49. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS TOWING AND RECOVERY BOARD.
There is hereby established for the Department of Labor and Licensing -
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
Arkansas Towing and Recovery Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X147C AR TOWING & RECOVERY BOARD DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(2) X101C INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(3) X170C AR TOWING & RECOVERY BD INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS03
(4) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4

SECTION 50. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS TOWING AND RECOVERY BOARD -
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and
Licensing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury
as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Arkansas
Towing and Recovery Board - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $147,074
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 56,982
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 73,228
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $277,284

SECTION 51. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDS COMPANY AND PROFESSIONAL BAIL BONDSMAN LICENSING
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
BOARD - FUND TRANSFER. The Professional Bail Bonds Company and Professional
Bail Bondsman Licensing Board shall deposit as special revenues sufficient
fees and penalties directly into the Bail Bondsman Board fund to provide for
personal services and operating expenses for the board. At the end of each
fiscal year, the Professional Bail Bondsman Licensing Board shall be allowed
to retain a fund balance sufficient to cover the personal services and
operating expenses of the board for the following fiscal year. Seventy-five
percent (75%) of any funds remaining in excess of this balance shall be
transferred to the General Revenue Fund Account in the State Treasury.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 52. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 53. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 54. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1163
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee




























03-12-2025 15:44:32 KMW004